Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LUTHERAN SOCIAL SERVICES CORE PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to Lutheran Social Services CORE program to provide home-delivered meals to veterans in Minnesota outside of Hennepin and Ramsey Counties and technical, enrollment, outreach, and volunteer recruitment assistance to member programs. This is a onetime appropriation. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available in the second year. new text end new text begin (b) Lutheran Social Services CORE program must report to the commissioner of veterans affairs and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over veterans affairs policy and finance by September 1 each year. The report must include a detailed explanation of how grant money was used and the number of veterans and service members served by the program. new text end